Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.540

Concealed pistol license renewal notification account.

The concealed pistol license renewal notification account is created in the state treasury. All funds collected under RCW 9.41.070 (5)(e) and (6)(d) must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only by the department of licensing for creation of a concealed pistol license renewal notification system and compliance with the notification requirement established in RCW 9.41.070(9)(b).

[ 2017 c 74 s 2.]